Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-130
Fire escapes; exits; regulation.

A second-class city shall have power to prevent the use of any opera house, city hall, church or other building resorted to by the people for worship, amusement or for public assemblages, unless such opera house, city hall, church or other building shall be provided with suitable, ample and sufficient fire escapes, and suitable, ample and sufficient means of exit and entrance.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 195;

R.S.1913, § 5024;

C.S.1922, § 4193;

C.S.1929, § 17-132;

R.S.1943, § 17-130.